Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299C.80, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Additional duty. (a) The unit shall investigate all criminal sexual conduct cases: (1) involving peace officers, including criminal sexual conduct cases involving chief law enforcement officers; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (2) where a member of the Minnesota National Guard is the victim, the accused is a member of the Minnesota National Guard, and the incident occurred in Minnesotanew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (3) where any member of the armed forces of the United States is either the victim or the accused, regardless of the state of residence or the location of the assigned unit of the accused or alleged victim, and the incident occurred at a state military installation, armory, or air base, or another facility owned or controlled by the state for military purposesnew text end . (b) The unit shall assist the agency investigating an alleged sexual assault of a member of the Minnesota National Guard by another member of the Minnesota National Guard that occurred in a jurisdiction outside of the state, if the investigating agency requests assistance from the unit. (c) The unit may also investigate conflict of interest cases involving peace officers.